trunk/apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.es.dix
    <pardef n="/ser__vbser">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>seríamos</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sería</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>seríais</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>serías</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>serían</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sería</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>seremos</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>seré</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>seréis</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>serás</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>serán</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>será</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuéremos</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuere</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuereis</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fueres</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fueren</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuere</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siendo</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siéndo</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuimos</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fui</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuisteis</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuiste</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fueron</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fue</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>seamos</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>séamo</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>séamos</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sed</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sed</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantad"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sé</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>séd</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantád"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sé</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sé</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cánta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sean</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>séan</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sea</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>séa</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ser</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ser</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sér</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantár"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éramos</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erais</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eras</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eran</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuéramos</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuésemos</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuera</l>
          <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuese</l>

      <e lm="ser necesario">
        <par n="/ser__vbser"/>
	<p>
          <l><b/>necesario</l> 
          <r><g><b/>necesario</g></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="ser dueño de la situación" a="delnou">
        <par n="/ser__vbser"/>
	<p>
          <l><b/>dueño<b/>de<b/>la<b/>situación</l> 
          <r><g><b/>dueño<b/>de<b/>la<b/>situación</g></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="ser">
        <par n="/ser__vbser"/>
      </e>
  <e lm="ser comprensible" a="mioara">
        <par n="/ser__vbser"/>
	<p>
          <l><b/>comprensible</l> 
          <r><g><b/>comprensible</g></r>
        </p>
      </e>
<e lm="ser incomprensible" a="mioara">
        <par n="/ser__vbser"/>
	<p>
          <l><b/>incomprensible</l> 
          <r><g><b/>incomprensible</g></r>
        </p>
      </e>
